Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.240

Stop-use, stop-removal, and removal orders.

(1) The director or a city sealer shall have the power to issue stop-use orders, stop-removal orders, and removal orders with respect to weighing or measuring devices being, or susceptible of being, commercially used within this state.

(2) The director or a city sealer shall also have the power to issue stop-removal orders and removal orders with respect to packages or amounts of commodities kept, offered, exposed for sale, sold, or in process of delivery.

(3) The director or a city sealer shall issue such orders whenever in the course of his or her enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder he or she deems it necessary or expedient to issue such orders.

(4) No person shall use, remove from the premises specified, or fail to remove from any premises specified any weighing or measuring instrument or device, commodity in packaged form, or amount of commodity contrary to the terms of a stop-use order, stop-removal order or removal order, issued under the authority of this section.

[ 1992 c 237 s 15; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 9; 1969 c 67 s 24.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.